Utah statutes.
57-11-8.   Examination by division on application for registration.
Upon receipt of an application for registration in proper form, the division
shall immediately initiate an examination to determine whether:
(1)  the requirements of Sections 57-11-6 and 57-11-7 have been satisfied;
(2)  the subdivider has not, or if a corporation or partnership, its officers,
directors, general partners, or persons occupying a similar status or
performing similar functions, or other principals as defined by the rules of
the division have not been convicted of a crime involving land dispositions or
any aspect of the land sales business in this state, the United States, or any
other state or foreign country within the past ten years and has not been
subject to any injunction or administrative order entered within the past ten
years restraining a false or misleading promotional plan involving land
dispositions; and
(3)  the public offering statement requirements of this chapter have been
satisfied.
